Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.300

Violations—Penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person violating any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted hereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor. Any offense committed more than five years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

[ 2003 c 53 s 105; 1969 c 129 s 30.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.